Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1307
County
clerks; election commissioners; deputies; oaths; acknowledgments.

All county clerks and
election commissioners and their deputies shall have authority
to administer oaths and affirmations in all cases where oaths and affirmations
are required and
to take acknowledgments of deeds, mortgages, and all other instruments in
writing, attesting
to such with the county seal.

Laws 1883, c. 19, § 1, p. 181;

R.S.1913, § 5611;

C.S.1922, § 4930;

C.S.1929, § 26-1007;

R.S.1943, § 23-1307;

Laws 2012, LB398, § 1.

Clerk must report fees for such services, though performed as notary public. State ex rel. Frontier County v. Kelly, 30 Neb. 574, 46 N.W. 714 (1890).

Clerk or deputy may administer oaths and affirmations. Merriam v. Coffee, 16 Neb. 450, 20 N.W. 389 (1884).